Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-14,105
Violation of access rights; remedies.

(1) If a tenant refuses to allow reasonable lawful access to the mobile home space, the landlord may terminate the rental agreement and recover actual damages.

(2) If a landlord makes an unlawful entry or makes repeated demands for entry otherwise lawful but which have the effect of unreasonably harassing the tenant, the tenant may obtain injunctive relief to prevent the recurrence of the conduct or terminate the rental agreement. In either case, the tenant may recover actual damages not less than an amount equal to one month's rent and reasonable attorney's fees.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 56.